Tennessee, session 114, SB1739.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 64-2-101, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting instead:
(a) There is created the North East Tennessee railroad authority in the counties
of Anderson, Campbell, Scott, Claiborne, Union, and Grainger.
(b) This authority is intended to secure economic benefits to the counties of
Anderson, Campbell, Scott, Claiborne, Union, and Grainger by providing for the
continuation of railroad service in Anderson, Campbell, Scott, Claiborne, Union, and
Grainger counties.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 64-2-102, is amended by deleting
subdivision (1) and substituting instead:
(1) Four (4) or more of the counties of Anderson, Campbell, Scott, Claiborne,
Union, and Grainger are authorized, by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of their respective
governing bodies, to become members of the authority;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 64-2-110, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting instead:
All contracts of the authority must be entered into and executed in such manner
as may be prescribed by statutes, regulations, and procedures governing contracting by
county governments; provided, that a contract or acquisition by purchase of equipment,
apparatus, materials, or supplies involving more than the applicable maximum threshold
SB1739
010164
- 1 -

over which public advertising and sealed competitive bids or proposals are required for
nonemergency, nonproprietary purchases as established pursuant to § 12-3-1212, or for
construction, installation, repair, or improvement of the property or facilities involving
more than such applicable maximum threshold must not be made until after the contract
has been advertised for bids. Purchases of like items must be aggregated for the
purposes of the bid threshold. Advertisement is not required when an emergency arises
and requires immediate delivery of the supplies or performance of the service.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010164